Massachusetts, session 194th, S355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 38R of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is amended by striking the last paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the 
following:- "The applicant shall not be required to pay a fee to offset the costs of operating and 
administering a fingerprint-based criminal background check system. The costs associated with 
operating and administering the system shall be fully borne by the Commonwealth."